Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.040

Retirement for service—Widow's or widower's pension—Payments to children.

Whenever any firefighter, *at the time of taking effect of this act or thereafter, shall have been appointed under civil service rules and have served for a period of twenty-five years or more as a member in any capacity of the regularly constituted fire department of any city, town or fire protection district which may be subject to the provisions of this chapter, and shall have attained the age of fifty years, he or she shall be eligible for retirement and shall be retired by the board upon his or her written request. Upon his or her retirement such firefighter shall be paid a monthly pension which shall be equal to fifty percent of the basic salary now or hereafter attached to the same rank and status held by the said firefighter at the date of his or her retirement: PROVIDED, That a firefighter hereafter retiring who has served as a member for more than twenty-five years, shall have his or her pension payable under this section increased by two percent of the basic salary per year for each full year of such additional service to a maximum of five additional years.

Upon the death of any such retired firefighter, his or her pension shall be paid to his widow or her widower, at the same monthly rate that the retired firefighter would have received had he or she lived, if such widow or widower was his wife or her husband for a period of five years prior to the time of his or her retirement. If there be no widow or widower, then such monthly payments shall be distributed to and divided among his or her children, share and share alike, until they reach the age of eighteen or are married, whichever occurs first.

[ 2007 c 218 s 45; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 70; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 29; 1965 ex.s. c 45 s 3; 1961 c 255 s 3; 1955 c 382 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The phrase "at the time of taking effect of this act or thereafter" first appears in the 1961 amendment, which became effective at midnight June 7, 1961 (see preface, 1961 session laws). The basic act, 1955 c 382, became effective at midnight June 8, 1955 (see preface, 1955 session laws).

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Applicability—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.18.102.

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.